Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1134 Exclusion from school. (a)
If for any reason a child becomes a detriment to the morals or discipline of
any school, the child may be precluded from attending school by the principal,
with the approval of the complex area superintendent. The department shall
seek the active participation of other public and private agencies in providing
help to these children before and after they have left school. An appeal may
be taken on behalf of the child to the superintendent of education within ten days
from the date of such action.

(b) Any child who, while attending school, is
found to be in possession of a firearm, shall be excluded from attending school
for not less than one year. The due process procedures of chapter 19 of the
Department of Education, Hawaii Administrative Rules, shall apply to any child
who, while attending school, is alleged to be in possession of a firearm. The
superintendent, on a case-by-case basis, may modify the exclusion of a child
found to be in possession of a firearm while attending school. If a child is
excluded from attending school, the superintendent shall ensure that substitute
educational activities or other appropriate assistance shall be provided. The
superintendent shall submit to the United States Department of Education, the
state board of education, and the legislature an annual report indicating the
number of students excluded, the types of firearms found in their possession,
and the schools from which they were excluded.

(c) Unless otherwise required by the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400, et seq., no person
who is twenty years of age or over on the first instructional day of the school
year shall be eligible to attend a public school; provided that if a person
reaches twenty years of age after the first instructional day of the school
year, the person shall be eligible to attend public school for the full school
year. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2 and am c 90, §3; am L 2003, c 187, §10; am L
2010, c 163, §1; am L 2014, c 215, §3]

Case Notes

Because student was ineligible under the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act when student commenced student's administrative
challenge to Act 163, L 2010 [which amended subsection (c)], student was fully
entitled to an automatic injunction preserving student's placement at a private
school during the pendency of the dispute; that automatic injunction should
have held in abeyance any changes to student's educational placement, whether
the result of Act 163 or some other cause. 727 F.3d 911 (2013).

Where student argued that department of education's (DOE)
appeal became moot when student turned twenty-two, and the sole object of
student's challenge to Act 163, L 2010 [which amended subsection (c)], was to
secure educational services until student reached the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act's default eligibility age of twenty-two, the appeal
was not moot because, inter alia, the DOE was reasonably likely to face these
challenges to the law again. 727 F.3d 911 (2013).

Act 163 [L 2010, amending subsection (c)] barring both
general education and special needs students from attending public school after
the last day of the school year in which they turned twenty violated the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA). The department of
education's community schools for adults, which were exempt from Act 163,
offered, at taxpayer expense, the opportunity for nondisabled twenty- and
twenty-one-year-olds to complete their secondary educations and earn high
school diplomas. Providing IDEA services to disabled children of those ages
would be consistent with "[S]tate law or practice ... respecting the
provision of public education", so the State must do so. However,
plaintiffs did not establish a prima facie case of disability discrimination
under the Americans with Disabilities Act or the Rehabilitation Act because
plaintiffs failed to produce evidence of the existence of a reasonable
accommodation; plaintiffs did not identify changes to the structure or
curricula of the community schools for adults that would make them generally
accessible to disabled students. 728 F.3d 982 (2013).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next